Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-401
Members and employees; personal liability insurance; authorized.

The governing board of any political subdivision in the State of Nebraska, may provide its members and employees of the political subdivision, either collectively or individually, with personal liability insurance coverage insuring against any liability and claim arising by reason of any act or omission in any manner relating to the performance, attempted performance, or failure of performance of official duties as such member or employee, and may authorize the payment of the premium, cost, and expense of such insurance from the general fund of such political subdivision.

Laws 1973, LB 339, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-175.01.